Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-218
Chief Justice; purchase liability insurance; for whom.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, or the State Court Administrator acting on his or her behalf, shall have the authority to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any judge, officer, or employee of any court in this state against any liability asserted against him or her and incurred by him or her in any such capacity or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the state would have the power to indemnify the individual against such liability under any other provision of law.

Laws 1981, LB 472, § 2.